Louisiana, session 2026, SB15.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:263(G) and 312(D) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§263. Prudent-man rule; investments; reporting
* * *
G.(1) Each system, plan, or fund governed by this Subpart shall submit to the
House and Senate committees on retirement and to each other state and statewide
retirement system electronically transmitted quarterly reports beginning with the
quarter ending June 30, 2010, of the amount of funds invested, a listing of each
investment and with whom, the annual returns on each investment, and the fees
paid by the retirement system for services related to each investment and to
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-149 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 15
whom paid, which shall be submitted no later than thirty calendar days after the end
of the quarter.
(2)(a) Each system, plan, or fund governed by this Subpart shall submit
to the House and Senate committees on retirement and to each other state and
statewide retirement system electronically transmitted annual reports on or
before the first of October each year. Each report submitted pursuant to this
Subsection Paragraph shall contain, at a minimum, the following:
(a)(i) The investment return net of investment fees and expenses expressed
as a percentage return and dollar amount.
(b)(ii) The amount of administrative expenses.
(c)(iii) The board-approved target asset allocation.
(d)(iv) The current actual asset allocation of the system portfolio.
(3)(b) Investment returns reported pursuant to this Subsection Paragraph
shall be by total fund and particular asset class over the quarter reported, fiscal year-
to-date, one year, three year, five year, and ten year periods.
* * *
§312. Application, definitions
* * *
D. Each system shall adopt rules necessary to implement the provisions of
this Subpart, including the provisions of Paragraph (C)(3) of this Section.
Section 2. R.S. 11:266.1(E), 312(C), and 315(D) are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Section 3. Each state and statewide retirement system shall cease providing any
retirement-system-specific reports to the House and Senate committees on retirement that
were previously required to be provided in compliance with any House Resolution, House
Concurrent Resolution, Senate Resolution, or Senate Concurrent Resolution that was
adopted on or before December 31, 2025. The duty to provide a report required by any such
resolution adopted after that date shall terminate at the end of the term in which the
resolution is adopted unless a different date is specified in the resolution.
Section 4. The Act shall become effect on June 30, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-149 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 15
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on June 30,
2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.